Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1502
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1503 to 38-1507 apply.

Laws 1969, c. 767, § 1, p. 2903;

Laws 1986, LB 701, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 50;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 148;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 681;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-4701;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 589;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 566;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 20;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 12.